West Virginia, session 2025, HB2246.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 30, 2024, authorized under the authority of §16A-3-1 of this code,  relating to the Department of Health (grower and processors of the Medical Cannabis Program, 64 CSR 110), is authorized.